North Carolina, session 2025, HB337.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The following described property, identified by Brunswick County
Tax Office Parcel Identification Number, is removed from the corporate limits of the City of
Southport:
221MB015, 221MB020, and 221MB02001.
SECTION 2. This act has no effect upon the validity of any liens of the City of
Southport for ad valorem taxes or special assessments outstanding before the effective date of
this act. Such liens may be collected or foreclosed upon after the effective date of this act as
though the property were still within the corporate limits of the City of Southport.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective June 30, 2025. Property in the territory
described in Section 1 of this act as of January 1, 2025, is no longer subject to municipal taxes
for taxes imposed for taxable years beginning on or after July 1, 2025.
*H337-v-1*